Arkansas, session 2025, HB1158.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 24-7-1308(b), concerning distribution
options under the Teacher Deferred Retirement Option, is amended to add an
additional subdivision to read as follows:
(3) A member may cancel his or her original election and elect
another distribution option under subdivision (b)(1) of this section if the
member:
(A) Did not elect to receive all or a part of the balance
in the plan account as a lump sum payable through an Internal Revenue Code
eligible rollover transaction;
(B) Has not previously changed his or her election;
(C) Cancels his or her election before the end of the
second full calendar month immediately following his or her effective
retirement date;
(D) Files with the system a new distribution election form
*LJH003*
01/16/2025 9:32:40 AM LJH003

HB1158
approved by the system; and
(E) Repays the system any amount that he or she is no
longer entitled to have received as a result of changing his or her election.

SECTION 2. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the operations of a state
public retirement system are complex; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement
System must be able to meet the needs of its members as anticipated by the
General Assembly; that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement
System Act, § 24-7-201 et seq., need immediate revision and updating to
address administrative complexities caused by these provisions and to bring
these provisions into conformance with sound public pension policy and
actuarial requirements; that the revisions and updates are of great
importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other
citizens of the State of Arkansas; that as the Arkansas Teacher Retirement
System operates on a fiscal year of July 1 to June 30, an effective date of
July 1, 2025, is necessary in order to allow the provisions within this act
to begin on the first day of the fiscal year and to allow for a structured
and proper administration of the procedures referenced in this act; that the
updates and revisions to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are of
great importance and necessary for protecting member benefits and clarifying
the reporting and contribution requirements of employers participating in the
Arkansas Teacher Retirement System; and that this act is necessary in order
to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas
Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and
this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health,
and safety, shall become effective on July 1, 2025.









01/16/2025 9:32:40 AM LJH003